Maryland, session 2026, HB0819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Commission to Examine the Expungement Laws of Maryland.
(b) The Commission consists of:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee;
(4) the Public Defender, or the Public Defender’s designee;
(5) the State Court Administrator, or the Administrator’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee; and
(7) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0819*

HOUSE BILL 819
(i) one representative of a research organization studying the
impact criminal records have on individuals in Maryland;
(ii) two individuals who are members of the Maryland bar with
experience providing expungement representation on behalf of Maryland residents;
(iii) one representative of a workforce organization in Maryland with
experience securing employment for individuals with criminal records;
(iv) one representative of an organization that assists individuals
with criminal records to reacclimate to society;
(v) two representatives of two different crime victims’ advocacy
groups, including one with expertise serving criminalized survivors of violence; and
(vi) two individuals who have a criminal record that is currently
ineligible for expungement.
(c) The members of the Commission shall elect a chair from among the members
of the Commission.
(d) The Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy shall provide staff for
the Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Commission shall:
(1) examine the expungement laws of Maryland and the current
expungement process under Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the Criminal Procedure Article for issues
of efficiency and equity;
(2) review comparable states’ expungement laws and their processes; and
(3) develop an alternate statutory scheme that provides a streamlined
process and broader eligibility.
(g) On or before December 31, 2027, the Commission shall, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, submit a report to the General Assembly of its
findings and recommendations.

HOUSE BILL 819 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.